Nevada, session 83, AB194.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 202 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. No person shall intentionally release, organize the release
of or intentionally cause the release of a balloon inflated with a
gas that is lighter than air.
2. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $250.
3. A civil penalty imposed pursuant to subsection 2 must be
recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General or by
the district attorney or city attorney for the jurisdiction in which
the violation occurred.
4. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section by:
(a) The Attorney General must be paid to the State Treasurer
for credit to the State General Fund.
(b) A district attorney or city attorney must be deposited in the
county or city treasury, as applicable.
5. The Attorney General or the district attorney or city
attorney of a county or city, as applicable, in which a person
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
releases a balloon in violation of subsection 1 may bring an action
to enjoin the violation.
6. As used in this section, “balloon” means any balloon made
of nonbiodegradable material or biodegradable material that
requires more than 5 minutes of contact with air or water to
degrade. The term does not include:
(a) A hot air balloon that is recovered after launching;
(b) A balloon used in a governmental or scientific research
project; or
(c) A balloon that is released and remains indoors.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)